Utah statutes.
76-8-702.   Purpose.

It is the purpose of this part to supplement and clarify the power vested in the governing board of each private or state institution of higher education and to regulate, conduct, and enforce law and order on property owned or controlled by it.



Enacted by Chapter 196, 1973 General Session

